Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-4022
Tax; interest;
penalty.

(1) Any tax imposed by section 77-4008
which is not paid on the due date shall become
delinquent, and a penalty of twenty-five percent shall be added thereto, and
shall bear interest at the rate prescribed by section 45-104.02,
as such rate may from time to time be adjusted, from the due date until paid.

(2) In addition to the penalty provided in
subsection (1) of this section, if the Tax Commissioner finds
that a licensee has made a false and fraudulent return with intent to evade
the Tobacco Products Tax Act, the Tax Commissioner shall assess a penalty
of twenty-five percent of the entire tax due for which the false and fraudulent
return was made, excluding interest.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 22;

Laws 1992, Fourth Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 39;

Laws 2014, LB33, § 5.